Illinois, session 104th, HB5458.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Administrative Act is amended by adding Section 68.2 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 1705/8.2 new)8    Sec. 8.2. State-operated developmental centers; 9readmissions. Notwithstanding any other law or rule to the 10contrary, a State-operated developmental center funded, 11certified, or licensed by the Department shall readmit, upon 12request, any former resident who transferred to and currently 13receives services at a licensed community-integrated living 14arrangement, if the former resident consents or if the former 15resident has a guardian with placement authority and that 16guardian consents based on a determination that the former 17resident's medical needs cannot be met by the program of 18services administered by the community-integrated living 19arrangement. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.